North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 19. Trademark for Standardized Farm Products. [Repealed]

§§ 106-198 through 106-202.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 244, s. 1(g).

§§ 106-202.1 through 106-202.5.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Reserved for future codification purposes.